Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.040

Amended foreign registration statement.

A foreign corporation registered to transact business in this state must amend its foreign registration statement under the circumstances specified in RCW 23.95.515.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2133; 1991 c 72 s 38; 1989 c 165 s 172.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.